Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-162
Morrill.

The county of Morrill is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of section eighteen, township seventeen, north, range fifty-two, west; thence north along the range line, between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three to the fifth standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-three, township twenty-one, north, range fifty-two, west; thence north along section lines to the northwest corner of section four, township twenty-three, north, range fifty-two west; thence east along the line between townships twenty-three and twenty-four to the northeast corner of section five, township twenty-three, north, range forty-six west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-two, on the fifth standard parallel; thence east along said parallel to the northeast corner of section five, township twenty, north, range forty-six, west; thence south along section lines to the northeast corner of Cheyenne County, at the southeast corner of section seventeen, township seventeen, north, range forty-six, west; thence west along the north line of Cheyenne County to the place of beginning.

Formed from Cheyenne County pursuant to Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 3, 1908;

R.S.1913, § 875;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 7, p. 826;

C.S.1922, § 777;

C.S.1929, § 25-164;

R.S.1943, § 22-162.